sv: Användningsområde för reservdel: Tilläggstillbehör; Eftermarknadsersättning; Underhåll/skötsel; OEM-ersättning; Uppgradering/prestanda; Annat
it: Scopo del pezzo di ricambio: Componente aggiuntivo; Ricambio aftermarket; Manutenzione / cura; Ricambio OEM; Upgrade / prestazioni; Altro
nl: Doel vervangingsonderdeel: Extra accessoire; Aftermarket-vervanging; Onderhoud/verzorging; OEM-vervanging; Upgrade/prestatie; Overig
lt-LT: Pakaitinės dalies tikslas: Papildomas priedas; Neoriginali atsarginė dalis; Priežiūra; Originali (OEM) atsarginė dalis; Atnaujinimas / našumo didinimas; Kita
bg-BG: Предназначение на резервната част: Добавка/аксесоар; Алтернативна резервна част; Поддръжка/грижа; Оригинална (OEM) резервна част; Надграждане/ефективност; Други
zh-CN: 替换零件用途: 附加配件; 售后替换件; 维护/保养; OEM 替换件; 升级/性能; 其他
cs: Účel náhradního dílu: Doplňkové příslušenství; Náhrada z druhovýroby (aftermarket); Údržba / péče; Náhrada OEM; Vylepšení / zvýšení výkonu; Jiný
pt-BR: Peça de reposição, finalidade: Acessório complementar; Reposição paralela (aftermarket); Manutenção / cuidados; Peça de reposição original (OEM); Upgrade / desempenho; Outro
ja: 交換ピース目的: アドオンアクセサリー; アフターマーケット交換部品; メンテナンス / お手入れ; OEM 交換部品; アップグレード / パフォーマンス; その他
pl: Przeznaczenie części zamiennej: Dodatkowe akcesorium; Część zamienna z rynku wtórnego; Konserwacja / pielęgnacja; Część zamienna OEM; Ulepszenie / wydajność; Inne
ko: 교체 부품 용도: 추가 기능 액세서리; 애프터마켓 교체품; 유지보수/관리; OEM 교체품; 업그레이드/성능; 기타
da: Formål med reservedel: Tilbehør som tilføjelse; Eftermarkedsudskiftning; Vedligeholdelse / pleje; OEM-udskiftning; Opgradering / ydeevne; Andet
sl-SI: Merilo daljinsko vodenega motorja: Dodatna oprema; Poprodajni nadomestni del; Vzdrževanje/nega; Originalni nadomestni del (OEM); Nadgradnja/zmogljivost; Drugo
th: วัตถุประสงค์ของชิ้นส่วนอะไหล่: อุปกรณ์เสริมส่วนขยาย; อะไหล่ทดแทน Aftermarket; การบำรุงรักษา / การดูแล; อะไหล่ทดแทน OEM; อัปเกรด / ประสิทธิภาพ; อื่นๆ
es: Propósito de las piezas repuesto: Accesorio complementario; Repuesto de mercado secundario; Mantenimiento/cuidado; Reemplazo de OEM; Mejora/rendimiento; Otro
hu: Cserealkatrész rendeltetése: Kiegészítő tartozék; Utángyártott cserealkatrész; Karbantartás / ápolás; Gyári (OEM) cserealkatrész; Fejlesztés / teljesítménynövelés; Egyéb
tr: Yedek parça kullanım amacı: Eklenti aksesuar; Satış sonrası yedek parça; Bakım / koruma; Orijinal yedek parça (OEM); Yükseltme / performans; Diğer
sk-SK: Účel náhradných dielov: Doplnkové príslušenstvo; Náhradný diel (aftermarket); Údržba/starostlivosť; Náhradný diel OEM; Inovácia/výkonnosť; Iné
nb: Formål med reservedel: Tilleggstilbehør; Ettermarkedsdel; Vedlikehold / pleie; OEM-erstatning; Oppgradering / ytelse; Annet
pt-PT: Finalidade da peça de substituição: Acessório extra; Substituição pós-venda; Manutenção/cuidados; Substituição de OEM; Melhoria/desempenho; Outro
zh-TW: 替換零件用途: 附加配件; 副廠替換件; 保養 / 維護; OEM 替換件; 升級 / 性能; 其他
el: Σκοπός εξαρτήματος αντικατάστασης: Πρόσθετο αξεσουάρ; Ανταλλακτικό aftermarket; Συντήρηση / φροντίδα; Ανταλλακτικό OEM; Αναβάθμιση / απόδοση; Άλλο
en: Replacement part purpose: Add-on accessory; Aftermarket replacement; Maintenance / care; OEM replacement; Upgrade / performance; Other
fr: Fonction de la pièce de rechange: Accessoire complémentaire; Pièce de rechange de seconde monte; Entretien / soin; Pièce de rechange d’origine (OEM); Mise à niveau / performance; Autre
fi: Varaosan tarkoitus: Lisävaruste; Tarvikevaraosa; Ylläpito / hoito; OEM-varaosa; Päivitys / suorituskyky; Muu
ro-RO: Scopul piesei de schimb: Accesoriu suplimentar; Piesă de schimb aftermarket; Întreținere / îngrijire; Piesă de schimb OEM; Upgrade / performanțe; Altele
vi: Mục đích của linh kiện thay thế: Tiện ích bổ sung; Thay thế linh kiện phụ trợ; Bảo trì / chăm sóc; Thay thế linh kiện OEM; Nâng cấp / hiệu suất; Khác
ru: Назначение запасной части: Дополнительный аксессуар; Неоригинальная запчасть; Обслуживание / уход; Оригинальная запчасть (OEM); Модернизация / улучшение характеристик; Другое
de: Zweck des Ersatzteils: Add-on-Zubehör; Aftermarket-Ersatz; Wartung / Pflege; OEM-Ersatzteil; Upgrade / Leistung; Sonstiges
hr-HR: Svrha zamjenskog dijela: Dodatni pribor; Zamjenski dio; Održavanje / njega; OEM zamjenski dio; Nadogradnja / učinkovitost; Ostalo